Massachusetts, session 194th, H390.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 138 of the General Laws or any other General
or Special law to the contrary, there shall be no distinction between a supermarket, convenience
store or package store whenever the holder of a license issued under the provisions of Section 15
of Chapter 138 is found to have been in violation of Section 34 of Chapter 138 relative to the
sale of alcohol to a minor or to an intoxicated individual that results in the suspension of all
commercial activity by the licensee as adjudicated by the local licensing authority in any city or
town which votes to authorize the granting of licenses for the sale of all alcoholic beverages. For
the purposes of this act, the suspension of commercial activity for a licensee shall mean that all
commercial activity, including the sale of non-alcoholic items, within the licensed establishment
shall cease for the period of the suspension.
of 1